Alabama, session 2026rs, HB411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Auxiliary of Big Oak Ranch,
Incorporated, is exempt from paying or collecting any state
sales and use taxes.
(b) Any county or municipality may exempt the entity
from the payment or collection of county or municipal sales
and use taxes in accordance with Section 40-23-4.01, Code of
Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB411 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................10-Feb-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Ways and Means
Education

Read for the second time and placed ................19-Feb-26
on the calendar:
0 amendments

Read for the third time and passed ................03-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 105
Nays 0
Abstains 0


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 2